Hawaii, session 2025, GM1380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the health and
welfare of the residents of the State depend largely on
residents' abilities to access reliable and reasonably priced
electric utility services. The public utilities commission is
tasked with regulating public utilities in the State, including
the provision of electric services.
The legislature notes that the financial condition of an
electric utility is essential to its ability to render services
to its customers. It is widely recognized that public utilities
must be fit, willing, and able to properly perform the services
offered and conform to the terms, conditions, and rules set
forth by the public utilities commission.
The legislature further finds that recent events have
threatened the financial well-being of a certain investor-owned
electric utility in the State, thereby potentially threatening
the well-being of the public, specifically their health, safety,
welfare, and economic viability.
2025-2874 SB1500 GDI SMA.docx
lllliHHIHIUIIIM

Page 2
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
The legislature also finds that the State's largest
investor-owned electric utility has undercapitalized its
wildfire mitigation investments, upgrades, and modernization of
its distribution and transmission grid infrastructure and
generation facilities.
Although existing law provides the public utilities
commission with the authority to appoint a receiver to operate a
failed or failing regulated water or sewer utility if it ceases
to operate or operates on a substandard or unacceptable level,
existing law does not contain express authority for the
commission to act on behalf of an electric utility's customers
if the utility experiences an urgent, serious, and imminent
threat to its ability to provide adequate services.
To ensure that the public utilities commission has the
necessary authority to take proactive measures on behalf of
customers when an investor-owned electric utility fails to
provide adequate and reasonable service to its customers or
creates a serious and imminent threat to the health and welfare
of its customers, the legislature believes that the commission
should have the power to appoint a receiver to ensure that
2025-2874 SB1500 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiiiiiimiiiiinHH

S.B. NO. s™
C.D. 1
electric services are continued or brought back up to
appropriate standards.
The legislature further notes that the goal of a
receivership is to protect a troubled company and to help the
company return to profitability, thereby allowing it to thrive
when the receivership period ends. An appointed receiver can
also ensure that employees are compensated during the protected
period and that operations continue to comply with government
regulations and standards.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the
public utilities commission to appoint a receiver to take
temporary action, should the commission find it necessary, to
assure continued adequate electric services from a failing
investor-owned electric utility.
SECTION 2. Section 269-14.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Whenever the commission finds that a regulated water
uti1ity, regulated investor-owned electric utility, or regulated
sewer utility is failing, or that there is an imminent threat of
the utility failing, to provide adequate and reasonable service
to its customers, and that the failure is a serious and imminent
2025-2874 SB1500 CDl SMA.docx

Page 4 S.B. NO. s™
C.D. 1
threat to health, safety, and welfare, the commission may
appoint a receiver to take any temporary action necessary to
assure continued service or to bring the service up to
appropriate regulatory standards. The commission may also
S appoint a receiver to take any temporary action necessary to
assure continued service if, after notice and hearing, the
commission finds that any water, electric, or sewer utility
regulated under this chapter consistently fails to provide
adequate and reasonable service. In carrying out its
responsibilities, the receiver and any additional outside legal
counsel, consultants, or staff the commission or receiver may
deem necessary under the circumstances, shall have the authority
to gain access to all of the utility company assets and records
and to manage those assets in a manner that will restore or
maintain an acceptable level of service to customers. The
receiver shall be authorized to expend existing utility company
revenues for labor and materials and to commit additional
resources as are essential to providing an acceptable level of
service. [Thcso] The appointed receiver shall recognize and
maintain the terms and conditions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement at the time of and throughout receivership
2025-2874 SB1500 CDl SMA.docx

Page 5 1500
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
and shall not induce or cause a reduction in force, or terminate
a covered employee, other than for a cause consistent with any
collective bargaining agreement. Any expenditures shall be
funded in accordance with generally accepted ratemaking
practices. Any costs incurred by the commission, its staff, or
the appointed receiver under this section shall be the
responsibility of the utility in receivership or its ratepayers.
Control of and responsibility for the utility shall remain with
the receiver until the utility can be returned to the original
owners, transferred to new owners, or liquidated as the
commission determines to be in the public interest."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2874 SB1500 CDl SMA.docx
■■iiiHiiiinM

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 2nd day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI'I

S.B. No. 1500, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certily that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
202

SB No. 1500, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives